troff/libhnj/hyphen.d/hyph_de_DE.dic
weit3r6
welt3r6
wer1f
wer4fl
wer4ka
wer4ta
wer8ku
wer8te6r1m
wes1te
wet8ta
wi1k6
wi2chs
wi2dr4
wi2m1m
wi2n1d
wic8h
wich6s5t
wie1d
wie1de4
wieder5
wim6ma
win4d3r4
wisc8h
wisch5l6
wo1c
wo1che6
wo2r1t
woc8h
wol6f
wor6t5r6
wu1sc
wu2n1d
wu2t1
wun1de
wun6gr4
wy5a
wä1sc
wä6r1m
wär1me5
x1ak
x1an
x1c
x1erz
x1g
x1k
x1m
x1r
x1s6
x1z
x2t1h
x3a4men
x3e4g
x5ul
x6tak
x8ter1f4
xa1me
xe1ro
xi8so
xu1e
y1b
y1c
y1d
y1g
y1j
y1k2
y1lak
y1le
y1lo
y1na
y1o4p
y1on.
y1p2o1
y1pr6
y1r
y1si
y1t
y1z
y2m1p2
y2r1r2
y2s5iat
y3mu
y3w
y4chia
y5an.
y5ank
y5e2rn
y5h
y5in
y5la1x
y5lu
y5ou
y6cha
y8m1n8
y8ps
yc8h
yen6n
yl1al
yla8m
yn1t
yno2d
yr2i3e
ys8ty1
yä8m
z1g
z1wal
z1wel
z1wer
z1zi
z2e1r8i
z4t3e2n1d
z4t3hei
z5a6b
z5auf
z5q
z6we8r1g
z8o1g
z8thi
za1b5l8
za5is
zan1ge
ze1d
ze1di
ze1f
ze1le
ze1ro
ze2l1t
ze2r1s8
ze2r1t
ze4di1k
ze6la
ze8lec
ze8r1g
ze8s1te
zei1te
zei4ta
zei8te2r1s
zel8th
zen1ge
zen1zi
zen8zin
zer8tab
zer8tag
zerta8
zeu6gr4
zi1en
zi1na
zi1tr6
zi5es.
zi5th
zi6ns
zin1se
zin1su
zin6s5er
zist5r6
zo1on
zo2rn
zo6gl
zor6na8
zu1b4
zu1f2
zu1n2a
zu1ne
zu1o
zu1s8
zu1z
zu3al
zun1f8
zup8fi
zw8
zwei3s
zwi1s
zz8a
zzi1s
zö1le
ß1a8
ß1b8
ß1c
ß1d
ß1f8
ß1g
ß1h
ß1k
ß1l
ß1m
ß1n
ß1o
ß1p8
ß1r
ß1s2
ß1ta
ß1te
ß1ti
ß1tr6
ß1v
ß1w
ß1z
ß5ec
ß5q
ß5to
ß8as
ßst8
ßt3hei
ä1a6
ä1che
ä1de
ä1di
ä1e
ä1gna
ä1he
ä1hi
ä1hu
ä1isc
ä1k
ä1le
ä1mi
ä1ne
ä1no
ä1pa
ä1re
ä1ri
ä1ro
ä1ru
ä1sche
ä1se
ä1te
ä1ti
ä1to
ä1um.
ä1us.
ä1z
ä2chs
ä2ft
ä2gs
ä2ls
ä2m8s
ä2n1d
ä2r1t
ä2s1th
ä2ts
ä3chi
ä5chu
ä5fa
ä5i2s1m
ä5j
ä5na
ä5rö
ä5tu
ä6d5ia
ä6g5nan
ä6hr
ä6i1sche
ä6ns
ä6r1m
ä6s5chen
ä6thy
ä6u5i
ä8l1c
ä8lei
ä8r1g
äb1l8
äc1k5a
äc2k
äc8h
äch8sc
äch8sp2
äd1a
äd5era
äf1l
äf2t6s
äg1h
äg3le
äg5str6
ägn8
äh1le
äh1re
äh1ru
äh1w
äh5ne
äh5ri
äisc8h
äl1sc
äl6schl6
älsc8h
äm8n8
ämi1e
än1de
än6s5c
äne5i8
äng3l
änk5l8
äp6s5c
är1c
är1ge
är1me
är2t6s5
är2z1t
är6gl
äre8m
äsc8h
äse6n8s
ät2e1ri4
ät8schl6
äta8b
äter5it
äts1p2
ätsc8h
äu1e
äu8ga
äub1l8
ö1b
ö1che
ö1de
ö1he
ö1hu
ö1is
ö1ke
ö1mu
ö1ni
ö1no
ö1re
ö1ri
ö1ru
ö1te
ö1ti
ö1tu
ö1v
ö1w
ö2chs
ö2cht6
ö2ff
ö2r1t
ö2z
ö5chi
ö5na
ö5o6t
ö5th
ö6hr
ö6l1k
ö6l1p
ö8r1g
öc8h
öch8s2tei
öch8str6
öchs1te
öh1l8
öh1re
öl6k5l8
öl8pl8
öni2g6s3
öp6s5c
öpf3l
ör8g1li
ör8tr6
ös1te
öwe8
ü1b1r
ü1b6e2
ü1che
ü1chi
ü1de
ü1di
ü1ge
ü1he
ü1hu
ü1le
ü1lu
ü1re
ü1ri
ü1ro
ü1ru
ü1se
ü1te
ü1ti
ü1tu
ü1v
ü2chs
ü2d1o4
ü2d5s6
ü2ls
ü2n1d
ü2r1s
ü2t1t
ü2tz
ü3k
ü3ta
ü5pi
ü6deu
ü6h5e6rk
ü6hr
ü6l1p
ü6ll
ü8c2k
ü8ch3l6
ü8heh
ü8r1g
ü8rei
ü8sta
ü8stes
üb1l8
üc1k1a
üc8h
üch6s5c
ück5e2r1s
üd1a2
üdi8t
üg1l
üge4l5a
üh1le
üh1re
üh1ru
üh1w
üh5a
ül4l5a
ül4ps
ül6s5c
ül8lo
ün1f
ün1fe
ün6zw8
ün8da
ün8fei
ün8za
ünk5l8
ür1f
ür1ge
ür8fl
ür8fr6
ür8geng
ür8sta
üs1te
üs2s3te
üse8n
üt1ze
üt8tr6
üt8zei
